District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-204.95

Board of Education.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 811, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 495
July 7, 2000, D.C. Law 13-159, § 2, 47 DCR 2212
June 1, 2007, 121 Stat. 223, Pub. L. 110-33, § 1(a)(2)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.19, § 1-315.02, § 38-175, § 38-1101, § 38-1121, § 38-1201.03, and § 38-2651.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-101(a).

Effective Dates

Section 5 of D.C. Law 13-159 provided: “This act shall take effect following ratification by a majority of the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia voting in a referendum held for such purpose and a 35-day period of Congressional review as provided in section 303 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-203.03), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.”

Editor's Notes

Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) expired on July 7, 2004.

In sections 901 to 903 of D.C. Law 17-9, the Council of the District of Columbia requested that Congress repeal this section.

Section 1 of Public Law 106-226 provided:

“Section 1. Waiver of congressional review period for school governance charter amendment act of 2000.

“Notwithstanding section 303 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act or any provision of the School Governance Charter Amendment Act of 2000, the School Governance Charter Amendment Act of 2000 shall take effect upon the date such Act is ratified by a majority of the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia voting in a referendum held to ratify such Act.”